public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xN ïèser isaràetu/I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xN ïèser isarae/J4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xN ïèser isaràeu/I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xN ïèser isarae ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xN ïèser isaralo/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xN ïèser isarise/J5j5N0 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xN ïèser isaraƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà

# vèrbi '-er inregolari: pu?oder
# TODO pòser? poser?
# TODO dover => dòxer? doxer?
SFX xO Y 82
SFX xO oder òso/J1FS oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òl oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òlo/J1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òƚo/J1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òse/J1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xO oder òle/J1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xO oder òƚe/J1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular	# T8 + e
SFX xO oder òlomi/I1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òƚomi/I1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + o
SFX xO oder òlemi/I1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e
SFX xO oder òƚemi/I1 oder	ds:indicative+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T8 + e
SFX xO oder òle/J5 oder	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xO oder òƚe/j5 oder	ds:indicative+present is:third	# T8 + e = T10
SFX xO oder òlelo/I5 oder	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T10
SFX xO oder òƚeƚo/i5 oder	ds:indicative+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T10
SFX xO der 0/J3 oder	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4
SFX xO der tu/I3 oder	ds:indicative+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4
SFX xO der rò/J1I1 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rò
SFX xO der rà/J1I1 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xO der remo/J2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xO der rémoi/I2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xO der rimo/J2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xO der rímoi/I2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xO der rà/J3I3 oder	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xO der ré/J3 oder	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + ré
SFX xO der retu/I3 oder	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + ré
SFX xO der ré/J4I4 oder	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + ré
SFX xO der rí/J4I4 oder	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + rí
SFX xO der ría oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xO der résimo oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + résimo
SFX xO der rísimo oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rísimo
SFX xO der ría oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xO der resi/J4 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xO der résïu/I4 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési
SFX xO der resi/J3 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rési
SFX xO der résitu/I3 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési
SFX xO der ría oder	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ría
SFX xO der rave/J1J6 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der ràvemi/I1I6 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rave/J2 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der ràvei/I2 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rave/J3 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der ràvetu/I3 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rave/J4 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der ràveu/I4 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rae/J1I1 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rae/J2I2 oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rae/J3I3 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rae/J4I4 oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der rae oder	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xO der ré/J1I1 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + ré
SFX xO der ron/J2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + ron
SFX xO der roni/I2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + ron
SFX xO der ren/J2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + rén
SFX xO der reni/I2 oder	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rén
SFX xO der ríe oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ríe
SFX xO der ree oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rée
SFX xO der ree oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rée
SFX xO der ree oder	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rée
SFX xO der ron oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der ronse oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der ronsi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der rion oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der rionse oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der rionsi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der rison oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der risonse oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der risonsi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der rision oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der risionse oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der risionsi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(se)
SFX xO der ren oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der rense oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der rensi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der risen oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der risense oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der risensi oder	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xO der rié oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + r(is)ié
SFX xO der riè oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + r(is)iè
SFX xO der risié oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + r(is)ié
SFX xO der risiè oder	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + r(is)iè
SFX xO der ríe oder	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ríe
