public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.dic
rïèser/t1c0c1c7l171n1P0PlP7R0RlR7xN	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple dp:re
poder/t0l070n0t1p4l474P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xO	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
puoder/t0l070n0t1p4l474P0PlP7Q0QlQ7xO	po:verb ds:infinitive+simple
